Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Article 1. Classification of Militia.

§ 44-1.
Composition of militia.

The militia of the Commonwealth of Virginia shall consist of all able-bodied residents of the Commonwealth who are citizens of the United States and all other able-bodied persons resident in the Commonwealth who have declared their intention to become citizens of the United States, who are at least 16 years of age and, except as hereinafter provided, not more than 55 years of age. The militia shall be divided into three classes: the National Guard, which includes the Army National Guard and the Air National Guard; the Virginia Defense Force; and the unorganized militia.

History.

1930, p. 948; 1942, p. 642; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(1); 1944, p. 24; 1958, c. 393; 1970, c. 662; 1973, c. 401; 1976, c. 399; 1979, c. 647; 1984, c. 765; 1989, c. 414; 2011, cc. 572, 586; 2015, c. 221.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 572 and 586 are identical, and in the first sentence substituted “able-bodied residents of the Commonwealth who are citizens of the United States” for “able-bodied citizens of this Commonwealth” and made minor stylistic changes, and in the last sentence, deleted “State” preceding “Defense Force” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 221 substituted “three classes” for “four classes” and deleted “the naval militia” following “Virginia Defense Force” in the last sentence.

Law Review.

For essay, “Article I, Section 13 of the Virginia Constitution: Of Militias and an Individual Right to Bear Arms,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 215 (2013).

§ 44-2.
Composition of National Guard.

The National Guard shall consist of the regularly enlisted militia and of commissioned and warrant officers, who shall be residents of the Commonwealth of Virginia and shall fall within the age limits and qualifications as prescribed in existing or subsequently amended National Guard regulations (army and air), organized, armed and equipped as hereinafter provided. Upon original enlistment members of the National Guard shall not be less than 17 nor more than 55 years of age, or, in subsequent enlistments not more than 64 years of age.

Notwithstanding the above, persons otherwise qualified but residing outside the Commonwealth of Virginia, may enlist or serve as commissioned or warrant officers in the National Guard.

History.

1930, p. 948; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(2); 1958, c. 393; 1976, c. 399; 1979, c. 647; 2011, cc. 572, 586.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 572 and 586 are identical, and made minor stylistic changes in the last sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “All enlistments in the National Guard of persons under the age of eighteen years made prior to June 27, 1958, shall be held, and the same are hereby declared valid and effective in all respects, if otherwise valid and effective according to the law then in force.”

§ 44-2.1.
Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 414.

Cross references.

For the Virginia Defense Force, see now § 44-54.4 et seq.

§ 44-3.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 221, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 44-3, Composition of naval militia, derived from 1930, p. 949; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(3); 1972, c. 823; 1973, c. 401.

§ 44-4.
Composition of unorganized militia.

The unorganized militia shall consist of all able-bodied persons as set out in § 44-1, except such as may be included in §§ 44-2 and 44-54.6 and except such as may be exempted as hereinafter provided.

History.

1930, p. 949; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(4); 1970, c. 662; 1973, c. 401; 1984, c. 765; 2015, c. 221.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 221 deleted “44-3” and made related changes.

§ 44-5.
Exemptions from militia duty.

In addition to those exempted by the laws of the United States, the following persons shall be exempt from military duty under a state call:

The officers, judicial and executive, of the governments of the United States and the Commonwealth of Virginia;

The members of the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Virginia and of the Congress of the United States;

Persons in the active military or naval services of the United States;

Persons employed by the United States in the transmission of the mail;

The judges and clerks of courts of record;

The mayor and councilmen of incorporated cities and towns;

Members of the governing bodies of counties;

Sheriffs, United States district attorneys, attorneys for the Commonwealth and city attorneys;

Marine pilots;

All persons who because of religious belief shall claim exemption from military service, if the conscientious holding of such belief by such person shall be established under such regulations as the President of the United States shall prescribe, shall be exempted from militia service in any capacity that the President shall declare to be combatant; and

Such other persons as may be designated by the Governor in the best interests of the public and of the Commonwealth.

History.

1930, p. 949; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(5); 1958, c. 393; 1976, c. 399; 2011, cc. 572, 586.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 572 and 586 are identical, and renumbered subdivisions to remove repealed subdivisions and to delete subdivisions 4 and 11, which read: “Customhouse clerks” and “Lighthouse keepers,” respectively; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 44-6.
Maintenance of other troops.

In time of peace the Commonwealth shall maintain only such troops as may be authorized by the President of the United States; but nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting the rights of the Commonwealth in the use of the Virginia National Guard or Virginia Defense Force within or without its borders in time of peace and nothing contained in this chapter shall prevent the organization and maintenance of State Police or constabulary.

History.

1930, p. 949; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(6); 1958, c. 393; 1984, c. 765; 2011, cc. 572, 586.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 572 and 586 are identical, and deleted “State” preceding “Defense Force.”

§ 44-7.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 221, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 44-7, Classification of militia, derived from 1930, p. 948; 1942, p. 642; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(1); 1944, p. 24; 1958, c. 393; 1970, c. 662; 1973, c. 401; 1976, c. 399; 1979, c. 647; 1984, c. 765; 1989, c. 414; 2011, cc. 572, 586.